Indiana, session 2026, SB117.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-2.5-5-59 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 59. (a) For purposes of this section, "menstrual
discharge collection devices" means:
(1) tampons;
(2) panty liners;
(3) menstrual cups;
(4) sanitary napkins; and
(5) other similar tangible personal property designed to
promote hygiene in connection with the human menstrual
cycle.
(b) Sales of menstrual discharge collection devices are exempt
from the state gross retail tax.
SECTION 2. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) IC 6-2.5-5-59, as
added by this act, applies only to retail transactions occurring after
June 30, 2026.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a retail transaction is
2026 IN 117—LS 6199/DI 120


considered to have occurred after June 30, 2026, if the property
whose transfer constitutes selling at retail is delivered to the
purchaser or to the place of delivery designated by the purchaser
after June 30, 2026.
(c) Notwithstanding the delivery of the property constituting
selling at retail after June 30, 2026, a transaction is considered to
have occurred before July 1, 2026, to the extent that:
(1) the agreement of the parties to the transaction is entered
into before July 1, 2026; and
(2) payment for the property furnished in the transaction is
made before July 1, 2026.
(d) This SECTION expires January 1, 2029.
2026 IN 117—LS 6199/DI 120